Massachusetts, session 194th, H1979.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by inserting after section 89 the following sections: 
Section 90. Prohibiting the use of deception during juvenile custodial interrogations 
(a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following meanings: 
i. “Statement” means a juvenile’s oral assertion, written assertion, or nonverbal conduct if 
intended as an assertion. 
ii. “Juvenile” shall have the same meaning as set forth in G.L. ch. 119, section 89. 
iii. “Deception” means communicating, or relaying in any way, false or misleading facts, 
false or misleading information, false or misleading evidence, or unauthorized implicit or explicit 
offers of leniency. 

of 4 11  iv. “Custodial Interrogation” means any questioning by law enforcement officers, or 
persons acting on behalf of a law enforcement officers, in relation to an investigation, under 
circumstances where a reasonable juvenile would consider themselves to be in custody, and that 
questioning is likely to elicit an incriminating response. 
(b) A statement made by a juvenile during a custodial interrogation shall be presumed to 
be involuntary, and therefore inadmissible in any court where such statement is offered as 
evidence, if during the custodial interrogation a law enforcement officer, or person acting on 
behalf of a law enforcement officer, knowingly engages in deception. 
A statement that is involuntary, as described in the above paragraph, shall not form the 
basis of any further investigative activities; any evidence that flows from that statement shall be 
considered tainted by such deception, and shall be inadmissible as such. 
(c) The presumption that such statement, as described in subsection (b), is inadmissible, 
may be overcome if the Commonwealth proves, beyond a reasonable doubt, that the statement 
was voluntary and not made due to any deception. A failure to create and save an audiovisual 
recording of such a statement shall be a factor for the court to consider in determining whether 
the Commonwealth can meet its burden. 
(d) Nothing in this section shall abrogate the Commonwealth’s burden to prove a 
statement is voluntary prior to introducing that statement into evidence. 
(e) Subsection (b) shall apply to all statements, as described in subsection (b), made on or 
after the effective date of this statute. 
Section 91. Recording of Juvenile Custodial Interrogations 

of 4 32  (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following meanings: 
i. “Statement” means a juvenile’s oral assertion, written assertion, or nonverbal conduct if 
intended as an assertion. 
ii. “Juvenile” shall have the same meaning as set forth in G.L. ch. 119, section 89. 
iii. “Custodial Interrogation” means any questioning by law enforcement officers, or 
persons acting on behalf of a law enforcement officer, in relation to an investigation, under 
circumstances where a reasonable juvenile would consider themselves to be in custody, and that 
questioning is likely to elicit an incriminating response. 
iv. “Place of Detention” means a vehicle or fixed location under the control of law 
enforcement, including a police or sheriff’s station, holding cell, jail, correctional or detention 
facility, or any other place where a juvenile is held in order to conduct a custodial interrogation. 
v. “Recording” means an authentic, accurate, and unaltered audiovisual record, created 
by an electronic or digital device, that captures the entirety of what transpired during a custodial 
interrogation, including all parties involved in the custodial interrogation, and a fair and accurate 
representation of the space used for the custodial interrogation, commencing when law 
enforcement, or their representative(s), begins speaking with, or otherwise interacting with, a 
juvenile in said space, including any recitation of the juvenile’s constitutional rights, and ending 
when law enforcement, or their representative(s), stops speaking to, or otherwise interacting 
with, the juvenile in said space. 
(b) All statements made by a juvenile during a custodial interrogation in a place of 
detention shall be memorialized and documented through a recording. Failure to create and save 

of 4 53 such a recording shall make any statement made during such custodial interrogation, or any 
evidence resulting from the statement, inadmissible in any court where such statement or 
evidence is offered as evidence.  
(c) The presumption that such a statement or evidence, as described in subsection (b), is 
inadmissible, may be overcome if the Commonwealth proves, by clear and convincing evidence, 
that creating and saving a recording was not reasonably possible under the circumstances. 
(d) Lack of economic resources relative to the implementation of recording shall not be 
considered grounds to conclude that recording was not reasonably possible under subsection (c). 
(e) If the Commonwealth seeks to offer as evidence a statement, or evidence derived 
there from, made during a custodial interrogation outside of a place of detention, as defined in 
subsection (a), for which there is no recording, as defined by subsection (a), then the 
Commonwealth must prove, by clear and convincing evidence, that conducting the custodial 
interrogation in a place of detention was not reasonably possible.  
(f) Subsection (b) and (e) shall apply to all statements, as described in subsection (b) and 
(e), made on or after the effective date of this statute.